src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-Clex_karrii_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - karrii: # MLO, ok 
    karrii+N+Sg+Nom: karrii
    karrii+N+Sg+Gen: karrii
    karrii+N+Sg+Acc: karrii
    karrii+N+Sg+Ill: [karrijân, karrij]
    karrii+N+Sg+Loc: karrist
    karrii+N+Sg+Com: karrijn
    karrii+N+Sg+Abe: karriittáá
    karrii+N+Ess: karrin
    karrii+N+Par: karrid
    karrii+N+Pl+Nom: karriih
    karrii+N+Pl+Gen: karrij
    karrii+N+Pl+Acc: karrijd
    karrii+N+Pl+Ill: karrijd
    karrii+N+Pl+Loc: karrijn
    karrii+N+Pl+Com: [karrijguin, karrijgijn]
    karrii+N+Pl+Abe: karrijttáá
    
